Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-2630
Grant; application.

To be eligible to receive a grant under the Child Care Capacity Building and Workforce Grant Program, an eligible recipient shall complete the application form prescribed by the statewide organization and provide for a one-to-one match for the amount of the grant. The eligible recipient shall include the following required information in its grant application:

(1) A needs assessment showing the child care capacity and the needs of the eligible recipient at the time of application;

(2) How the eligible recipient plans to use the grant;

(3) How the eligible recipient plans to provide a one-to-one match for the amount of any grant received. Such match shall be in the form of:

(a) Money or other collateral;

(b) An in-kind donation, including a donation of facilities, maintenance, or equipment; or

(c) Any combination of money, collateral, or in-kind donation that is approved by the department; and

(4) Any other information required by the department.

Laws 2024, LB164, § 34.